Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-304 Trustees or receivers
obligations. An insurer may invest any of its funds, in an aggregate
amount not exceeding two per cent of its assets, in certificates, notes or
other obligations issued by trustees or receivers of institutions existing under
the laws of the United States or of any state, district or territory thereof,
which, or the assets of which, are being administered under the direction of
any court having jurisdiction, if the obligation is adequately secured as to
principal and interest. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next